Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1403
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education; established.

The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education is hereby established. The commission shall, under the direction of the Legislature, be vested with the authority for the coordination of public institutions in Nebraska as provided in Article VII, section 14, of the Constitution of Nebraska and the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 6.